South Dakota, session 2026, HB1057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-22-51.2 be AMENDED:
32-22-51.2. The unloading of livestock, as defined by subdivision 39-5-6(11) in
§ 39-5-6, is prohibited for the enforcement of violations of §§ 32-22-16 and 32-22-21.
The officer shall issue to the driver of the vehicle at the point of violation a special
overweight permit for the amount of the overload if the load cannot be adjusted to the
legal limits without unloading. The permit authorized pursuant to this section is issued at
the flat rate of one hundred dollars for an overweight permit. The flat rate shall include
the cost of issuing the permit. This permit authorizes the driver to operate the overweight
vehicle to the point of destination within the state or the point of exit from the state. This
permit does not, however, exempt the operator from any other enforcement actions.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-18:
During the period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2036, a person may
not sell, hold, offer for sale, or distribute in this state any product containing cell-cultured
protein, as defined in § 39-5-6.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Upon receipt of a complaint, the department may inspect any food service
establishment, mobile food service establishment, or temporary food service
establishment for a possible violation of this section, as provided in § 34-18-27.3. If the
inspection indicates the establishment is in violation of this section, the department must
issue a stop-sale order.
Upon any conviction pursuant to this section, the department may, if warranted,
proceed in accordance with chapter 1-26 to suspend, revoke, or deny renewal of the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.127.32 2 1057
license of the food service establishment, mobile food service establishment, or temporary
food service establishment, as provided under §§ 34-18-27.1 and 34-18-27.3.
Section 3. That § 39-5-6 be AMENDED:
39-5-6. Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Animal food manufacturer," any person engaged in the business of manufacturing
or processing animal food derived wholly or in part from carcasses, or parts or
products of the carcasses, of livestock;
(2) "Capable for use as human food," any carcass, or part or product of a carcass of
any livestock, unless it is denatured or otherwise identified as required by rules
promulgated pursuant to chapter 1-26 by the secretary to deter its use as human
food, or it is naturally inedible by humans;
(3) "Carcass," any part, including viscera, of any slaughtered livestock, that is capable
of being used for human food;
(4) "Cell-cultured protein," a product that is produced for use as human food, made
wholly or in part from any cell culture or DNA of a host animal, and grown or
cultivated outside a live animal. Cell-cultured protein does not include proteins
produced through microbial fermentation, enzymatic processing, traditional food
cultures, or biotechnology processes used in the manufacture of pharmaceuticals,
biologics, vaccines, dietary supplements, enzymes, or medical products, provided
those products are not intended to replicate meat or animal tissue for human
consumption;
(5) "Custom exempt plant," a person engaged in custom slaughtering and preparation
of meat food products for household use by the owner as provided in subdivision
39-5-11(2);
(5)(6) "Federal Meat Inspection Act," the act of Congress approved March 4, 1907, as
amended and extended to January 1, 1991 (21 U.S.C.) and the imported meat
provisions of subsections 620(b), (c) as amended to January 1, 1991;
(6)(7) "Inedible products renderer," any person engaged in the business of rendering
carcasses, or parts or products of the carcasses, of livestock, except rendering
conducted under inspection or exemption under this chapter;
(7)(8) "Inspector," an employee or official of this state authorized by the secretary to
inspect livestock or carcasses, parts thereof, or meat food products under this
chapter;
(8)(9) "Intrastate commerce," commerce wholly within this state;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.127.32 3 1057
(9)(10) "Label," a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon the immediate
container (, not including package liners), of any article;
(10)(11) "Labeling," any label or other written, printed, or graphic matter upon or
accompanying any article or any of its containers or wrappers;
(11)(12) "Livestock," cattle, bison, sheep, swine, goats, equine, ratites, captive cervidae
as permitted under § 40-3-14, and other species as requested by the owner and
authorized by the secretary;
(12)(13) "Livestock producer," any natural person, partnership, or corporation if over
fifty percent of his or its annual income is derived from production of agricultural
products and on whose farm the number of livestock is in keeping with the size of
the farm or the volume or character of the agricultural products produced thereon;
(13)(14) "Meat," the edible part of the muscle of cattle, bison, sheep, swine, goats,
equine, ratites, captive cervidae, and other species as requested by the owner and
authorized by the secretary, which is skeletal or which is found in the tongue, in
the diaphragm, in the heart, or in the esophagus, with or without the accompanying
and overlying fat, and the portions of bone, skin, sinew, nerve, and blood vessels
which normally accompany the muscle tissue and which are not separated from it
in the process of dressing. It does not include the muscle found in the lips, snout,
or ears;
(14)(15) "Meat broker," any person engaged in the business of buying or selling livestock
carcasses, parts thereof, or meat food products on commission, or otherwise
negotiating purchases or sales of such these articles other than for his own account
or as an employee of another person;
(15)(16) "Meat by-product," any edible part other than meat, which has been derived
from one or more cattle, bison, sheep, swine, goats, equine, ratites, captive
cervidae, and other species as requested by the owner and authorized by the
secretary;
(16)(17) "Meat food products," any product capable of use as human food, which is made
wholly or in part from any meat or other portion of the carcass of any cattle, bison,
sheep, swine, goats, equine, ratites, captive cervidae, and other species as
requested by the owner and authorized by the secretary, excepting products which
that contain meat or other portions of such carcasses only in a relatively small
proportion, or historically have not been considered by consumers as products of
the meat food industry, and which are exempted from definition as a meat food
product by regulations rules promulgated by the secretary pursuant to chapter 1-
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.127.32 4 1057
26, under such conditions as those conditions the secretary may deem appropriate
to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;
(17)(18) "Meat processing establishment," an official establishment as defined in this
section engaged in the preparation or processing of meat food products;
(18)(19) "Official certificate," any certificate prescribed by rules promulgated pursuant
to chapter 1-26 by the secretary for issuance by an inspector or other person
performing official functions under this chapter;
(19)(20) "Official establishment," any establishment in this state as determined by the
secretary at which inspection of the slaughter of livestock or the preparation of
livestock carcasses or parts thereof or meat products is maintained under this
chapter;
(20)(21) "Official inspection legend," any symbol prescribed by rules promulgated by the
secretary pursuant to chapter 1-26 showing that an article was inspected and
passed in accordance with this chapter;
(21)(22) "Official mark," the official inspection legend or any other symbol prescribed by
rules promulgated by the secretary pursuant to chapter 1-26 to identify the status
of any article or animal under this chapter;
(22)(23) "Prepared," slaughtered, canned, salted, rendered, boned, cut up, or otherwise
manufactured or processed;
(23)(24) "Retail dealer," any person engaged in selling carcasses, parts thereof, or meat
food products of cattle, bison, sheep, swine, goats, equine, ratites, captive cervidae, and
other species as requested by the owner and authorized by the secretary;
(24)(25) "Retail store meat processor," a person engaged in the retail sale of food for
human consumption, the retail sale of meat food products, and in the processing
or preparation of meat or meat by-products for retail sale as meat food products;
(25)(26) "Secretary," executive secretary of the South Dakota State Animal Industry
Board, or any person authorized to act in his stead;
(26)(27) "Slaughtering establishment," an official establishment as defined in this
section engaged in the slaughtering of livestock; and
(27)(28) "Veterinary inspector," an employee or official of this state, licensed to practice
veterinary medicine in this state, and authorized by the secretary to inspect
livestock or carcasses, parts thereof, or meat food products under this chapter.
Section 4. That § 39-5-38 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.127.32 5 1057
39-5-38. Any carcass, part of a carcass, product made of cell-cultured protein, or
meat food product of any livestock or any dying, crippled, or diseased livestock that is
being transported in this state, or is held for sale or donation in this state after such
transportation, and that:
(1) Is or has been prepared, sold, transported, or otherwise distributed or offered
or received for distribution in violation of this chapter; or
(2) Is capable of use as human food and is adulterated or misbranded; or
(3) In any other way is in violation of this chapter,
shall be is liable to be proceeded against and seized and condemned, at any time,
by an action in the circuit court of South Dakota this state within the jurisdiction of which
the article or animal is found. During the time period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending
June 30, 2036, any product made of cell-cultured protein in violation of this chapter, is
liable to be proceeded against and seized and condemned, at any time, by an action in
the circuit court of this state within the jurisdiction of which the article or animal is found.
If the article or animal is condemned, it shall must, after entry of the decree, be
disposed of by destruction or sale as the court may direct and the proceeds, if sold, less
the court costs and fees, and storage and other proper expenses, shall must be paid into
the treasury of this state, but the article or animal shall may not be sold contrary to the
provisions of this chapter or federal law: Provided, that upon. Upon the execution and
delivery of a good and sufficient bond conditioned that the article or animal shall may not
be sold or otherwise disposed of contrary to the provisions of this chapter or federal law,
the court may direct that such the article or animal be delivered to the owner thereof,
subject to such supervision by authorized representatives of the secretary of the Animal
Industry Board as is necessary, to ensure compliance with this chapter. When a decree of
condemnation is entered against the article or animal and it is released under bond, or
destroyed, court costs and, fees, and storage costs, and other expenses shall must be
awarded against the person, if any, intervening as claimant of the article or animal.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 39-5:
During the period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2036, a person may
not manufacture for sale in this state any product containing cell-cultured protein.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor, after notice is provided
pursuant to § 39-5-42.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.127.32 6 1057
Upon any conviction pursuant to this section, the secretary may proceed in
accordance with chapter 1-26 to suspend, revoke, or deny any of the violator's meat
processing licenses described in § 39-5-11.1.
Meat food products containing cell-cultured protein, manufactured in violation of
this section, may be seized and condemned pursuant to § 39-5-38, to be disposed of by
action of the circuit court having jurisdiction over the location where the product was
found.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.